Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 151 Geology and Water Resources
151.607.
Annual review and prioritization of planning councils’ plans.

After July 1, 2001, and annually thereafter, each area development district shall review and prioritize the planning councils’ plans for underserved and unserved areas within the 2020 water management area for that district. The review and prioritization shall be conducted with the assistance and input of the authority and the water management councils for the counties or multicounty areas within a 2020 water management area. These prioritization plans shall be submitted to the authority for review and approval. The authority may suggest changes necessary for the purpose of qualifying for financial assistance from the 2020 water service account of the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority.

Factors to be considered in prioritizing the plans for underserved and unserved areas within a 2020 water management area include:

The current and potential customer base that would benefit from water service;

The adequacy, cost-effectiveness, and dependability of water sources, water treatment capacity, and distribution lines that may be used to provide water service; and

The potential to eliminate or prevent duplication of water distribution lines and facilities that may be used to provide the service.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 529, § 6, effective July 14, 2000.